Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.720

Imposition of legal financial obligations—City, town, or county authority.

Cities, towns, and counties may not impose any legal financial obligations, fees, fines, or costs associated with juvenile offenses unless there is express statutory authority for those legal financial obligations, fees, fines, or costs.

[ 2015 c 265 s 5.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2015 c 265: See note following RCW 13.50.010.